Utah statutes.
53B-13-108.   Bonds and interest exempt from taxation except corporate franchise tax.

The bonds issued under this chapter and the interest on the bonds are exempt from all taxation in this state, except for the corporate franchise tax.



Enacted by Chapter 167, 1987 General Session

